Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2007
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Correcting filed document.

(1) A domestic or foreign corporation may correct a document filed by the Secretary of State if the document (a) contains an incorrect statement or (b) was defectively executed, attested, sealed, verified, or acknowledged.

(2) A document shall be corrected:

(a) By preparing articles of correction that (i) describe the document, including its filing date, or attach a copy of it to the articles of correction, (ii) specify the incorrect statement and the reason it is incorrect or the manner in which the execution was defective, and (iii) correct the incorrect statement or defective execution; and

(b) By delivering the articles of correction to the Secretary of State for filing.

(3) Articles of correction shall be effective on the effective date of the document they correct except as to persons relying on the uncorrected document and adversely affected by the correction. As to those persons, the articles of correction shall be effective when filed.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 7.